Illinois, session 104th, SB276.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 9-3 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/9-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 9-3)7    Sec. 9-3. Involuntary Manslaughter and Reckless Homicide. 8    (a) A person who unintentionally kills an individual 9without lawful justification commits involuntary manslaughter 10if his acts whether lawful or unlawful which cause the death 11are such as are likely to cause death or great bodily harm to 12some individual, and he performs them recklessly, except in 13cases in which the cause of the death consists of the driving 14of a motor vehicle or operating a snowmobile, all-terrain 15vehicle, or watercraft, in which case the person commits 16reckless homicide. A person commits reckless homicide if he or 17she unintentionally kills an individual while driving a 18vehicle and using an incline in a roadway, such as a railroad 19crossing, bridge approach, or hill, to cause the vehicle to 20become airborne. 21    (b) (Blank).22    (c) (Blank).23    (d) Sentence.  SB0276- 2 -LRB104 03916 RLC 13940 b1        (1) Involuntary manslaughter is a Class 3 felony.2        (2) Reckless homicide is a Class 3 felony.3    (e) (Blank).4    (e-2) Except as provided in subsection (e-3), in cases 5involving reckless homicide in which the offense is committed 6upon a public thoroughfare where children pass going to and 7from school when a school crossing guard is performing 8official duties, the penalty is a Class 2 felony, for which a 9person, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall be 10sentenced to a term of not less than 3 years and not more than 1114 years.12    (e-3) In cases involving reckless homicide in which (i) 13the offense is committed upon a public thoroughfare where 14children pass going to and from school when a school crossing 15guard is performing official duties and (ii) the defendant 16causes the deaths of 2 or more persons as part of a single 17course of conduct, the penalty is a Class 2 felony, for which a 18person, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall be 19sentenced to a term of not less than 6 years and not more than 2028 years. 21    (e-5) (Blank).22    (e-7) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e-8), in 23cases involving reckless homicide in which the defendant: (1) 24was driving in a construction or maintenance zone, as defined 25in Section 11-605.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, or (2) was 26operating a vehicle while failing or refusing to comply with   SB0276- 3 -LRB104 03916 RLC 13940 b1any lawful order or direction of any authorized police officer 2or traffic control aide engaged in traffic control, (3) was 3driving at a speed of more than 20 miles per hour in excess of 4the posted speed limit, or (4) failed or refused to comply with 5a traffic control aide or device engaged in traffic control, 6the penalty is a Class 2 felony, for which a person, if 7sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall be sentenced to a 8term of not less than 3 years and not more than 14 years.9    (e-8) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the 10defendant caused the deaths of 2 or more persons as part of a 11single course of conduct and: (1) was driving in a 12construction or maintenance zone, as defined in Section 1311-605.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, or (2) was operating a 14vehicle while failing or refusing to comply with any lawful 15order or direction of any authorized police officer or traffic 16control aide engaged in traffic control, the penalty is a 17Class 2 felony, for which a person, if sentenced to a term of 18imprisonment, shall be sentenced to a term of not less than 6 19years and not more than 28 years.20    (e-9) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the 21defendant drove a vehicle and used an incline in a roadway, 22such as a railroad crossing, bridge approach, or hill, to 23cause the vehicle to become airborne, and caused the deaths of 242 or more persons as part of a single course of conduct, the 25penalty is a Class 2 felony. 26    (e-10) In cases involving involuntary manslaughter or   SB0276- 4 -LRB104 03916 RLC 13940 b1reckless homicide resulting in the death of a peace officer 2killed in the performance of his or her duties as a peace 3officer, the penalty is a Class 2 felony. 4    (e-11) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the 5defendant unintentionally kills an individual while driving in 6a posted school zone, as defined in Section 11-605 of the 7Illinois Vehicle Code, while children are present or in a 8construction or maintenance zone, as defined in Section 911-605.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, when construction or 10maintenance workers are present the trier of fact may infer 11that the defendant's actions were performed recklessly where 12he or she was also either driving at a speed of more than 20 13miles per hour in excess of the posted speed limit or violating 14Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 15    (e-12) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e-13), 16in cases involving reckless homicide in which the offense was 17committed as result of a violation of subsection (c) of 18Section 11-907 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, the penalty is a 19Class 2 felony, for which a person, if sentenced to a term of 20imprisonment, shall be sentenced to a term of not less than 3 21years and not more than 14 years.22    (e-13) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the 23offense was committed as result of a violation of subsection 24(c) of Section 11-907 of the Illinois Vehicle Code and the 25defendant caused the deaths of 2 or more persons as part of a 26single course of conduct, the penalty is a Class 2 felony, for   SB0276- 5 -LRB104 03916 RLC 13940 b1which a person, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall 2be sentenced to a term of not less than 6 years and not more 3than 28 years. 4    (e-14) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the 5defendant unintentionally kills an individual, the trier of 6fact may infer that the defendant's actions were performed 7recklessly where he or she was also violating subsection (c) 8of Section 11-907 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The penalty 9for a reckless homicide in which the driver also violated 10subsection (c) of Section 11-907 of the Illinois Vehicle Code 11is a Class 2 felony, for which a person, if sentenced to a term 12of imprisonment, shall be sentenced to a term of not less than 133 years and not more than 14 years. 14    (e-15) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the 15defendant was operating a vehicle while failing or refusing to 16comply with subsection (c) of Section 11-907 of the Illinois 17Vehicle Code resulting in the death of a firefighter or 18emergency medical services personnel in the performance of his 19or her official duties, the penalty is a Class 2 felony.20    (e-16) In cases involving reckless homicide in which the 21offense was committed as a result of a violation of Section 226-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code and the defendant caused 23the deaths of 2 or more persons as part of a single course of 24conduct, the penalty is a Class 2 felony, for which a person, 25if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall be sentenced to a 26term of not less than 6 years and not more than 28 years.   SB0276- 6 -LRB104 03916 RLC 13940 b1    (f) In cases involving involuntary manslaughter in which 2the victim was a family or household member as defined in 3paragraph (3) of Section 112A-3 of the Code of Criminal 4Procedure of 1963, the penalty shall be a Class 2 felony, for 5which a person if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall be 6sentenced to a term of not less than 3 years and not more than 714 years.8(Source: P.A. 101-173, eff. 1-1-20.)